District of Columbia statutes.
29-1003.02

Formation of limited cooperative association; articles of organization.

(a)

To form a limited cooperative association, an organizer of the association must deliver articles of organization to the Mayor for filing. The articles shall state:

(1)

The name of the association, which shall comply with §§ 29-103.01 and 29-103.02(h);

(2)

The purposes for which the association is formed;

(3)

The street address and, if different, mailing address of the association’s initial principal office and the information required by § 29-104.04;

(4)

The name and street address and, if different, mailing address of each organizer; and

(5)

The term for which the association is to exist if other than perpetual.

(b)

Subject to § 29-1001.09(a), articles of organization may contain any other provisions in addition to those required by subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

A limited cooperative association shall be formed after articles of organization that substantially comply with subsection (a) of this section are delivered to the Mayor, are filed, and become effective under § 29-102.03.

(d)

If articles of organization filed by the Mayor state a delayed effective date, a limited cooperative association shall not be formed if, before the articles take effect, an organizer signs and delivers to the Mayor for filing a statement of cancellation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-101.06 and § 29-1002.01.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 302 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.